Utah statutes.
26-21-11.   Violations -- Denial or revocation of license -- Restricting or prohibiting new admissions -- Monitor.

If the department finds a violation of this chapter or any rules adopted pursuant to this chapter the department may take one or more of the following actions:

(1) serve a written statement of violation requiring corrective action, which shall include time frames for correction of all violations;

(2) deny or revoke a license if it finds:

(a)  there has been a failure to comply with the rules established pursuant to this chapter;

(b)  evidence of aiding, abetting, or permitting the commission of any illegal act; or

(c)  conduct adverse to the public health, morals, welfare, and safety of the people of the state;

(3) restrict or prohibit new admissions to a health care facility or revoke the license of a health care facility for:

(a)  violation of any rule adopted under this chapter; or

(b)  permitting, aiding, or abetting the commission of any illegal act in the health care facility;

(4) place a department representative as a monitor in the facility until corrective action is completed;

(5) assess to the facility the cost incurred by the department in placing a monitor;

(6)  assess an administrative penalty as allowed by Subsection 26-23-6(1)(a); or

(7)  issue a cease and desist order to the facility.

